Illinois, session 104th, HB1271.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Fire Investigation Act is amended by adding 5Section 13.1.1 as follows: 6    (425 ILCS 25/13.1.1 new)7    Sec. 13.1.1. MABAS continuing appropriation for warehouse 8tornado disaster response.9    (a) The General Assembly finds that, because of the 10large-scale footprint of many large warehouse complexes in 11this State, and because emergency responders face difficulties 12in coordinating personnel and equipment from a variety of 13agencies in a given geographic region to respond to tornado 14disasters at large warehouse complexes, the State should 15further invest moneys into the Mutual Aid Box Alarm System 16(MABAS) to assist emergency responders with respect to 17responding to tornado disasters at large warehouse complexes 18in this State.19    (b) In this Section:20        "Large warehouse complex" means one or more warehouses 21    at the same location, whose individual or combined 22    warehouse space is at least 400,000 square feet, operating 23    under the same management.  HB1271- 2 -LRB104 06208 BDA 16243 b1        "Mutual Aid Box Alarm System" or "MABAS" means an 2    intergovernmental organization established under Section 3    10 of Article VII of the Illinois Constitution and the 4    Intergovernmental Cooperation Act that, through 5    prearranged mutual aid and dispatch agreements among 6    participating units of local government, engages in 7    mutual-aid responses for the purpose of disaster 8    preparedness and response.9    (c) Beginning July 1, 2026, the Office shall, in 10consultation with MABAS, annually determine what funding is 11necessary for MABAS to sufficiently alleviate difficulties 12that emergency responders face in coordinating personnel and 13equipment from participating agencies and units of local 14government when responding to tornado disasters at large 15warehouse complexes in this State.16    (d) By July 1, 2026, the Office shall, in consultation 17with MABAS, establish a formula for the distribution of the 18funding provided under subsection (c) that considers the risk 19of tornadoes, the total square footage of warehouse space at 20large warehouse complexes, and the human population of the 21large warehouse complexes during all working hours.22    (e) Beginning July 1, 2026, there is hereby appropriated, 23on a continuing annual basis in each fiscal year, from the 24General Revenue Fund to the Office, to be distributed under 25this Section or rules adopted under this Section for the 26maintenance, operation, and capital expenses of MABAS, an   HB1271- 3 -LRB104 06208 BDA 16243 b1amount equal to that determined under subsection (c) of this 2Section.3    (f) The Office shall adopt rules before July 1, 2026, 4implementing this Section.  5    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 6becoming law.